Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. In General
§ 37-2-133.
Exemption for purchase of coal fired generation facilities that would otherwise have been retired; public utility purchase requirements; conditions for exemption.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter and chapters 1 and 3 of this title shall not apply to a person who operates a coal fired electric generation facility purchased under an agreement approved by the commission under W.S.

37-3-117

.

Electric public utilities, other than cooperative electric utilities, shall be obligated to purchase electricity generated from a coal fired electric generation facility purchased under agreement approved by the commission under W.S.

37-3-117

provided that:

The person purchasing the otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility offers to sell some or all of the electricity from the facility to an electric public utility;

The electricity is sold at a price that is no greater than the purchasing electric utility’s avoided cost as may be determined by the commission;

The electricity is sold under a power purchase agreement with a specified term length and such other terms and conditions as may be approved by the commission; and

The commission approves a one hundred percent (100%) cost recovery in rates for the cost of the power purchase agreement and the agreement is one hundred percent (100%) allocated to the public utility’s Wyoming customers unless otherwise agreed to by the public utility.

In determining an electric public utility’s avoided costs under this section, the commission may consider:

The value of the electric energy and capacity generated from the facility;

The value of any reliability benefits associated with the operation of the facility; and

Any other factor deemed appropriate by the commission.

The commission may elect to set the avoided cost price and other terms and conditions for the purchase of electricity from an otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility in advance of the facility’s proposed retirement date to permit potential purchasers to know the avoided cost price and other terms and conditions for sales from that facility prior to entering into an agreement to purchase the facility.

As used in this section, “avoided cost” means the incremental costs to an electric utility of electric energy or capacity or both which, but for the purchase from the otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility, the utility would generate itself or incur in a purchase from another source. As may be determined by the commission, avoided costs may change over the course of an approved power purchase agreement at specified intervals set forth in the power purchase agreement.

A person purchasing an otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility may sell electricity generated by the facility to the electric public utility selling the otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility, except for a cooperative or municipal public utility, for the benefit of a retail customer located in the existing service territory of that electric public utility provided that the customer has more than one (1) megawatt average demand and takes service at a primary or transmission voltage level.

If an electric utility purchases electricity from the owner of an otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility for the benefit of an eligible retail customer, the utility serving that eligible retail customer shall purchase the electricity at a cost and under terms and conditions that are acceptable to and negotiated between the customer and the owner of the otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility. The electric public utility shall pass that cost through to the customer without markup or modification except:

For the collection of applicable taxes and the appropriate assessment, which shall be collected pursuant to W.S.

37-2-106

through

37-2-109

;

To ensure other Wyoming customers are not negatively impacted by the arrangement provided for in this subsection and subsection (f) of this section, the commission shall also authorize the utility to impose additional charges on participating retail customers to the extent the commission determines that a sale of electricity under this subsection and subsection (f) of this section will result in the utility experiencing incremental stranded generation capacity costs or other incremental costs except for the cost of any undepreciated investments associated with the otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility.

An eligible retail customer under subsection (g) of this section shall only receive electricity as provided in subsection (g) of this section from the owner of an otherwise retiring coal fired electric generation facility if the customer also purchases partial requirements or equivalent service from the electric public utility under rates, terms and conditions set by the commission to compensate the public utility for its costs.

History.

2019 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a) added “Except as otherwise provided in this section” to the beginning; and added (f) through (h).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "uniform" following "appropriate" in (g)(i).

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 193, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 37-2-134.
Electric generation facility closures; presumption; commission review.

As used in this section:

“Dispatchable” means as defined in W.S. 37-18-101(a)(ii) and includes dispatchability;

“Retirement” or “retired” means the closure of or the complete and permanent cessation of operations at an electric generation facility. “Retirement” or “retired” shall not include:

An electric generation facility that is closed in order to facilitate a conversion to, or replacement with, an advanced nuclear reactor that is operated in accordance with W.S.

35-11-2101

;

Any closure mandated by federal law; or

Any closure resulting from federal environmental requirements to where it is no longer cost effective for the facility to continue operating.

“Electric generation facility” means a facility located in Wyoming that uses coal or natural gas to generate reliable and dispatchable electricity for provision to customers;

“Reliable” means as defined in W.S. 37-18-101(a)(iv).

Before authorizing or approving the retirement of an electric generation facility as proposed in a rate case, integrated resource plan or other submission to the commission, the commission shall consider the effect on available reliable, dispatchable electricity to Wyoming customers and the impact that any shortage of available energy nationwide may have on Wyoming customers.

There shall be a rebuttable presumption against the retirement of an electric generation facility. The commission shall not approve the retirement of an electric generation facility unless the presumption created by this subsection is rebutted by evidence deemed sufficient by the commission to establish that:

Cost savings will result to customers as a result of the retirement of the electric generation facility;

The retirement will not result in an insufficient amount of reliable and dispatchable capacity to serve Wyoming customers; and

The retirement will not adversely impact the dispatchability or reliability of electric service to customers of the public utility.

The rate recovery limitations of W.S.

37-3-118

shall apply to a public utility that completes a retirement of an electric generation facility without rebutting the presumption specified in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve a public utility of the requirements to comply with W.S.

37-2-133

and

37-3-117

before the retirement of an electric generation facility.

History.

2021 ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 103, § 1, effective March 21, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

added (a)(ii)(A); added (a)(ii)(B) and (a)(ii)(C) designations; and made related changes.

Laws 2022, ch. 103, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 21, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 154, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.